Maryland, session 2026, SB0845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–504.
(a) (1) (i) Information from the agencies specified in this paragraph shall
be reported to the State Administrator in a format and at times prescribed by the State
Board.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0845*

SENATE BILL 845
(ii) The Maryland Department of Health shall report the names and
residence addresses [(if known)], IF KNOWN, of all individuals at least 16 years of age
reported deceased within the State since the date of the last report.
(iii) Each month, the clerk of the circuit court for each county and the
administrative clerk for each District Court shall report the names and addresses of all
individuals convicted, in the respective court, of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment
with commitment papers.
(iv) The clerk of the circuit court for each county shall report the
former and present names and residence addresses [(if known)], IF KNOWN, of all
individuals whose names have been changed by decree or order of the court since the date
of the last report.
(2) The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the clerk of the
United States District Court for the District of Maryland to receive reports of names and
addresses, if available, of individuals convicted of a felony in that court and sentenced to
imprisonment with commitment papers.
(3) The State Administrator shall make arrangements with the United
States Social Security Administration or an entity that receives information from the Social
Security Administration and is approved by the State Administrator to receive reports of
names and addresses, if available, of all Maryland residents at least 16 years of age who
are reported deceased.
(b) (1) The State Administrator shall transmit to the appropriate local board
information gathered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Every agency or instrumentality of any county which acquires or
condemns or razes or causes to be condemned or razed any building used as a residence
within the county shall promptly report this fact and the location of the building to the local
board in the county or city.
(3) Registration cancellation information provided by an applicant on any
voter registration application shall be provided to the appropriate local board by the State
Administrator or another local board.
(4) A local board may:
(i) make arrangements to receive change of address information
from an entity approved by the State Board; and
(ii) pay a reasonable fee to the entity for the information.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, whenever
a local board becomes aware of an obituary or any other reliable report of the death of a

SENATE BILL 845 3
registered voter, the election director shall mail a notice to the registered voter, as
prescribed by the State Board, to verify whether the voter is in fact deceased.
(ii) On receipt of a verification of the death of a voter, provided in
accordance with the notice mailed under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the election
director may remove the voter from the statewide voter registration list under § 3–501 of
this subtitle.
(2) (i) Whenever a local board receives a report obtained by the State
Administrator under subsection [(a)(3)] (A)(1)(II) OR (3) of this section [that includes a
registered voter] OR FROM THE OFFICIAL VITAL STATISTICS AGENCY OF ANOTHER
STATE OR TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES OF THE DEATH OF A REGISTERED
VOTER, the election director shall [mail to the address shown on the statewide voter
registration list, by regular U.S. mail, a notice that:
1. states that the registered voter has been reported by the
Social Security Administration to have died; and
2. notifies the registered voter or a person attending the
affairs of a deceased voter that the voter will be removed from the statewide voter
registration list unless, within 2 weeks after the date of the letter, the registered voter or a
representative:
A. objects to the removal; and
B. shows cause why the removal should not proceed.
(ii) If the registered voter or a representative timely objects and
shows cause why the removal should not proceed, the election director may:
1. terminate the removal process and retain the registered
voter on the statewide voter registration list; or
2. refer the matter to the local board for a hearing to
determine the registered voter’s status.
(iii) If the registered voter or a representative fails to timely object
and show cause why the removal should not proceed, the registration shall be canceled and
the registered voter removed from the statewide voter registration list] IMMEDIATELY
REMOVE THE REGISTERED VOTER FROM THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION
LIST.
(II) IF THE ELECTION DIRECTOR RECEIVES INFORMATION THAT
A VOTER REMOVED FROM THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION LIST UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS NOT IN FACT DECEASED, THE ELECTION
DIRECTOR SHALL:

SENATE BILL 845
1. RESTORE THE VOTER TO THE STATEWIDE VOTER
REGISTRATION LIST; OR
2. REFER THE MATTER TO THE LOCAL BOARD FOR A
HEARING TO DETERMINE THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTER REGISTRATION STATUS.
(III) IF THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT A LOCAL BOARD
IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE
BOARD SHALL:
1. ISSUE WRITTEN FINDINGS OF NONCOMPLIANCE;
2. REQUIRE THE LOCAL BOARD TO DEVELOP A
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN WITH DEADLINES FOR COMPLIANCE; AND
3. MONITOR THE LOCAL BOARD’S IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN UNTIL THE LOCAL BOARD IS IN COMPLIANCE.
(IV) IF A LOCAL BOARD FAILS TO SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLY WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 2 MONTHS,
THE STATE BOARD MAY:
1. WITHHOLD DISCRETIONARY ELECTION
ADMINISTRATION FUNDS UNTIL THE LOCAL BOARD IS IN COMPLIANCE;
2. REQUIRE MANDATORY RETRAINING OF LOCAL BOARD
STAFF; AND
3. REFER A LOCAL BOARD THAT IS PERSISTENTLY
NONCOMPLIANT TO THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE AUDITS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.